Washington statutes.
RCW 38.16.010

Period of enlistment in national guard.

The period of enlistment in the Washington national guard shall conform to the laws and regulations of the United States department of defense governing such enlistments including the term of such enlistments and the maximum and minimum age of enlistment.

[ 1989 c 19 s 29; 1943 c 130 s 35; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-35. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 30; 1909 c 134 s 41; 1895 c 108 s 57.]